Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.015

Regulating dairy products—Commission created—Existing comprehensive scheme—Laws applicable.

The history, economy, culture, and the future of Washington state's agriculture involves the dairy industry. In order to develop and promote Washington's dairy products as part of an existing comprehensive scheme to regulate those products the legislature declares:

(1) That the Washington state dairy products commission is created. The commission may also take actions under the name "the dairy farmers of Washington";

(2) That it is vital to the continued economic well-being of the citizens of this state and their general welfare that its dairy products be properly promoted by (a) enabling the dairy industry to help themselves in establishing orderly, fair, sound, efficient, and unhampered marketing, grading, and standardizing of the dairy products they produce; and (b) working to stabilize the dairy industry by increasing consumption of dairy products within the state, the nation, and internationally;

(3) That dairy producers operate within a regulatory environment that imposes burdens on them for the benefit of society and the citizens of the state and includes restrictions on marketing autonomy. Those restrictions may impair the dairy producer's ability to compete in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(4) That it is in the overriding public interest that support for the dairy industry be clearly expressed, that adequate protection be given to agricultural commodities, uses, activities, and operations, and that dairy products be promoted individually, and as part of a comprehensive industry to:

(a) Enhance the reputation and image of Washington state's agriculture industry;

(b) Increase the sale and use of Washington state's dairy products in local, domestic, and foreign markets;

(c) Protect the public by educating the public in reference to the quality, care, and methods used in the production of Washington state's dairy products;

(d) Increase the knowledge of the health-giving qualities and dietetic value of dairy products; and

(e) Support and engage in programs or activities that benefit the production, handling, processing, marketing, and uses of dairy products produced in Washington state;

(5) That this chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state; and

(6) That the dairy industry is a highly regulated industry and that this chapter and the rules adopted under it are only one aspect of the regulated industry. Other regulations and restraints applicable to the dairy industry include the:

(a) Federal marketing order under 7 C.F.R., Part 1124;

(b) Dairy promotion program under the dairy and tobacco adjustment act of 1983, Subtitle B;

(c) Milk and milk products act under chapter 15.36 RCW and rules, including:

(i) The national conference of interstate milk shippers pasteurized milk ordinance;

(ii) The national conference of interstate milk shippers dry milk ordinance;

(iii) Standards for the fabrication of single-service containers;

(iv) Procedures governing cooperative state-public health service;

(v) Methods of making sanitation ratings of milk supplies;

(vi) Evaluation and certification of milk laboratories; and

(vii) Interstate milk shippers;

(d) Milk and milk products for animal food act under chapter 15.37 RCW and rules;

(e) Organic products act under chapter 15.86 RCW and rules;

(f) The food safety and security act under chapter 15.130 RCW;

(g) Washington food processing act under chapter 69.07 RCW and rules;

(h) Washington food storage warehouses act under chapter 69.10 RCW and rules;

(i) Animal health under chapter 16.36 RCW and rules;

(j) Weighmasters under chapter 15.80 RCW and rules; and

(k) Dairy nutrient management act under chapter 90.64 RCW and rules.

[ 2018 c 236 s 705; 2011 c 103 s 29; 2002 c 313 s 87.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.